Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1191.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Dr. Constance E. Clayton Way.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Constance Elaine Clayton was born October 23, 1933, in Philadelphia, the only child of Willabell Harris Clayton and Levi Clayton. She was raised by her mother and maternal grandmother, Sarah Harris.(2) Surrounded by a loving, tight-knit family that sought to give her a well-rounded education and development, Dr. Clayton was engaged in the arts, local and national government and her community. She learned the cello and the piano, was an active member of North Philadelphia's St. Paul's Baptist Church and, at eight years of age, was 12345678910111213141516171819 selected to deliver a welcome address on behalf of Eleanor Roosevelt during the first lady's visit to Philadelphia.(3) Dr. Clayton attended Dunbar Elementary School and graduated from the Philadelphia High School for Girls. She attended Temple University and, in 1955, received a bachelor of arts degree and a master of arts degree, specializing in elementary school administration. She entered the ranks of teaching at the former William Henry Harrison School in North Philadelphia, where she taught fourth grade classes for nine years.(4) During this time, Dr. Clayton played a critical role in developing academic curricula for the School District of Philadelphia, leading to her becoming a collaborator in the school district's social studies department. She spent five years designing social studies curricula for elementary grades and then became project director of the school district's African and Afro-American studies program in 1969.(5) Dr. Clayton briefly left the School District of Philadelphia in 1971 to serve as regional director of the United States Department of Labor's Women's Bureau, addressing pay inequity and supporting women's employment in the Mid-Atlantic region.(6) Dr. Clayton returned to the School District of Philadelphia as director and then associate superintendent of the school district's early childhood education program from 1973 to 1983, during which time she also earned her doctor of philosophy degree from The Pennsylvania State University and her doctor of education degree in educational administration at the University of Pennsylvania Graduate School of Education, where she was a Rockefeller Foundation fellow. 20260SB1191PN1463 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Under her direction, the early childhood education program grew to become a national model.(7) In 1983, Dr. Clayton defeated 83 other candidates to become superintendent of the School District of Philadelphia, the first African American and first woman to do so. She inherited a school district marred by budget setbacks, low test scores, declining enrollment and persistently high student poverty rates. Nonetheless, she won plaudits for her visionary and innovative leadership, enhancing mathematics and science instruction, achieving fiscal stability, implementing a long overdue capital improvements plan and effectively navigating tense labor relations. Under her leadership, the school district attracted significant private-sector support.(8) Dr. Clayton excelled at financial management, balancing the budget and leaving the School District of Philadelphia with a surplus by the end of her tenure. She standardized the curriculum and authored the school district's first curriculum guide for African-American studies, conducting regular teacher training in African-American studies to ensure well-informed staff and educators. She also provided significant support to district students, launching the homeless student initiative, a broader sexual education program and America 2000, a national plan for urban schools to improve student achievement by the year 2000.(9) Dr. Clayton's leadership led to her appointment to numerous boards, including the Public Broadcasting Service, the Private Industry Council and the National Board of Medical Examiners. She was named a trustee of Drexel University, Widener University and Bryn Mawr College and was 20260SB1191PN1463 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a member of the American Association of School Administrators, the Committee to Support Philadelphia Public Schools and the Children's Defense Fund.(10) In 1992, Dr. Clayton became the first African-American woman to have a professorship named for her at an Ivy League institution when the University of Pennsylvania established the Constance E. Clayton Professorship in Urban Education.(11) Dr. Clayton retired from her role in 1993, leaving a legacy of fiscal discipline and successful programming that boosted student achievement and inspired a generation of pupils during an era of tumult and upheaval in the City of Philadelphia.(12) In 1993, Dr. Clayton was the honoree at the annual benefit of the Afro-American Historical and Cultural Museum of Philadelphia, where she received recognition from the United States Secretary of Education, Richard Riley, for her pioneering work on behalf of Philadelphia's schoolchildren, work that earned her the reputation as the "preeminent educator in the country."(13) Dr. Clayton's post-school-district career included service in academia as a faculty member of the School of Public Health and the Medical College of Philadelphia and as interim dean of the School of Public Health at Hahnemann University.(14) A lifelong patron of the arts, Dr. Clayton served on the board of the Philadelphia Museum of Art, where she founded and chaired the African American Collections Committee, which worked to build the collection of African-American art at the museum. An art collector herself, she 20260SB1191PN1463 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 made historic gifts of art to both the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts and the Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture at the New York Public Library and established the Clayton Fellowship to support building pipelines of African-American art curators by connecting them with professional art curator organizations.(15) Dr. Clayton peacefully passed away Monday, September 18, 2023, leaving behind a legacy of service to the City of Philadelphia that saw her receive numerous awards and 17 honorary doctorates, as well as constant recognition from the General Assembly. It is fitting and proper that the General Assembly acknowledge a towering figure in Philadelphia who devoted her life to improving educational opportunities for children.(b) Designation.--The portion of Pennsylvania Route 611, also known as Broad Street, from Spring Garden Street to Callowhill Street in the City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County, is designated as the Dr. Constance E. Clayton Way.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20260SB1191PN1463 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223